Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2008
Beverage container connectors; requirements.

On and after January 1, 1991, a person shall not sell or offer for sale at retail any beverage for human consumption if the beverage container is connected to another beverage container by a device which is constructed of a material which is not biodegradable, photodegradable, or recyclable.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 72.